examples/apertium-hin.hin.dix.xml
	<pardef n="चमडी__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>चमड़ी</l><r>चमडी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="फूल__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>फुलदान</l><r>फूल<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="छुट्टी__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l>छुट्टियां</l><r>छुट्टी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="वक्त__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>वक़्त</l><r>वक्त<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="मालकीन__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l>मालकिन</l><r>मालकीन<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="फ़रमान__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>फर्मा</l><r>फ़रमान<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="कण्ठ__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>कंठस्थ</l><r>कण्ठ<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="कचौड़ी__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>कचोरी</l><r>कचौड़ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="आईना__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l>आयना</l><r>आईना<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="ड्राईवर__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>ड्रायवर</l><r>ड्राईवर<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="व्यतीत__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>व्यतित</l><r>व्यतीत<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="दीया__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>दिए</l><r>दीया<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="की__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>कि</l><r>की<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="शुभकामना__n">
	  <e>       <p><l>एं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="बोड__n">
	  <e>       <p><l>ा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="आनंद__n">
      <e>       <p><l>ित</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="नाग__n">
      <e>       <p><l>लोक</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="दया__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l>ं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="इच्छा__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l>नुसार</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="आज्ञा__n_f">
	  <e>       <p><l>धारी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="वर्षानुवर्ष__n_f">
	  <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="बिरंग__n_f">
	  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="गुण__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>वान</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="शब्द__n_m">
	  <e>       <p><l>ः</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="वामन__n_m">
	  <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="मूर्ति__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>यां</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="धुंआ/__n_m">
	  <e>       <p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>ए</l><r>ए<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>एँ</l><r>एँ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="आश्चर्य__na_m">
	  <e>       <p><l>चकित</l><r><s n="na"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="केंचुआ__n_m">
	  <e>       <p><l>केंचुआ</l><r>केंचुआ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>केंचुए</l><r>केंचुआ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="लायसन__n_nt">
	  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="वनभोज__n_nt">
	  <e>       <p><l></l><r>न<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="mixed__n">
      <e>       <p><l>कोकम</l><r>कोकम<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>निराश</l><r>निराश<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>स्टॉल</l><r>स्टॉल<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>सुरुसुरू</l><r>सुरुसुरू<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>कुरुकुरू</l><r>कुरुकुरू<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>पल्लू</l><r>पल्लू<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>परवा</l><r>परवाह<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>चॉकलेट</l><r>चॉकलेट<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>झरझर</l><r>झरझर<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>पुटूपुटू</l><r>पुटूपुटू<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>स्टीयरिंग</l><r>स्टीयरिंग<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>भुर्रर्र</l><r>भुर्रर्र<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>डर्रर्र</l><r>डर्रर्र<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>सहन</l><r>सहना<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>बायीं</l><r>बायां<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>बवाल</l><r>शोर<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>पुर्तगेज</l><r>पोर्तुगाली<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>बवाल</l><r>बवाल<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>हॉर्न</l><r>हॉर्न<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>दिनभर</l><r>दिन<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>मीनिन</l><r>मीनिन<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>पदेर</l><r>पदेर<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>फरमाई</l><r>फरमान<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>बुरूज</l><r>बुर्ज<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>उसी</l><r>उस<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>सुखी</l><r>सुख<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>सायड</l><r>सायड<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>चांदनी</l><r>चांद<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>हालचाल</l><r>हालात<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>बुद</l><r>बुद<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>दसवीं</l><r>दस<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>बीज़</l><r>बीज़<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>म्हापश्या</l><r>म्हापशें<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>बूढ़ी</l><r>बूढ़ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>पट्टियां</l><r>पट्टी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>सन्मान</l><r>मान<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="चौगुडो__n_num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Paradigm Adjectives -->        

	<pardef n="null__adj">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
	  </pardef>

	<e lm="चौगुडो"><i>चौगुडो</i><par n="चौगुडो__n_num"/></e>
	<e lm="चमड़ी"><i></i><par n="चमडी__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="फुलदान"><i></i><par n="फूल__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="छुट्टियां"><i></i><par n="छुट्टी__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="वक़्त"><i></i><par n="वक्त__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="फर्मा"><i></i><par n="फ़रमान__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="कंठस्थ"><i></i><par n="कण्ठ__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="कचोरी"><i></i><par n="कचौड़ी__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="मालकिन"><i></i><par n="मालकीन__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="आयना"><i></i><par n="आईना__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="ड्रायवर"><i></i><par n="ड्राईवर__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="व्यतित"><i></i><par n="व्यतीत__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="दिए"><i></i><par n="दीया__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="कि"><i></i><par n="की__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="कोकम"><i></i><par n="mixed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="शुभकामनाएं"><i>शुभकामना</i><par n="शुभकामना__n"/></e>
	<e lm="बोडा"><i>बोड</i><par n="बोड__n"/></e>
	<e lm="आनंदित"><i>आनंद</i><par n="आनंद__n"/></e>
	<e lm="सुगंधित"><i>सुगंध</i><par n="आनंद__n"/></e>
	<e lm="नागलोक"><i>नाग</i><par n="नाग__n"/></e>
	<e lm="दयां"><i>दया</i><par n="दया__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="इच्छानुसार"><i>इच्छा</i><par n="इच्छा__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="आज्ञाधारी"><i>आज्ञा</i><par n="आज्ञा__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="वर्षानुवर्षी"><i>वर्षानुवर्ष</i><par n="वर्षानुवर्ष__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="बिरंगी"><i>बिरंग</i><par n="बिरंग__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="गुणवान"><i>गुण</i><par n="गुण__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="शब्दः"><i>शब्द</i><par n="शब्द__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="वामनो"><i>वामन</i><par n="वामन__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="मूर्तियां"><i>मूर्ति</i><par n="मूर्ति__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="धुंआ"><i>धुं</i><par n="धुंआ/__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="आश्चर्यचकित"><i>आश्चर्य</i><par n="आश्चर्य__na_m"/></e>
	<e lm="केंचुए"><i></i><par n="केंचुआ__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="लायसन"><i>लायसन</i><par n="लायसन__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="वनभोजन"><i>वनभोज</i><par n="वनभोज__n_nt"/></e>
	<e lm="धडाधड"><i>धडाधड</i><par n="null__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="स्वादिष्ट"><i>स्वादिष्ट</i><par n="null__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="व्याकुल"><i>व्याकुल</i><par n="null__adj"/></e>
